Missouri, session 2026, HB2533.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 167.034, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 167.034, to read as follows:
167.034. 1. [In any city not within a county where] If a child under the age of
seventeen required to attend school under section 167.031 accumulates fifteen or more
absences without an accompanying note of excuse from the child's physician during any
one school year, the child's school district shall schedule a meeting between the child's
school counselor, the child, and the child's parent, legal guardian, or other person
having charge, custody, or control of the child. At such meeting, the interested parties
shall develop a plan of action to prevent further unexcused absences by the child.
2. If the child's parent, legal guardian, or other person having charge, custody,
or control of the child fails to attend such meeting or the child accrues additional
unexcused absences in conflict with the plan of action, the school district shall report
such absences to the children's division [within ten business days of the fifteenth day of
absence] of the state department of social services within one week after such absences.
Such notification, which shall be in written form and retained in the student's school records,
shall include:
(1) The student's full name and parents' or guardians' full names;
(2) The addresses and phone numbers of the student and parents or guardians;
(3) The student's date of birth and age;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2533 2
(4) The student's current school and grade level;
(5) The student's current grades for all classes in which the student is enrolled; and
(6) The total number of days missed and specific days missed from school.
[2.] 3. Upon receipt of a report of the absences of a child or a child's parent, legal
guardian, or other person having charge, custody, or control of the child under
subsection 2 of this section, the children's division shall conduct a home visit andnotify the
child's parent [or], legal guardian, or other person having charge, custody, or control of
the child that the child has accumulated [fifteen or more] unexcused absences in conflict
with the plan of actionand thatsuch report [may] shallbe subject to the educational neglect
provisions under section 210.145 if the child accrues additional unexcused absences. The
notification required under this section is required regardless of whether a student's parent or
guardian contacted the school and approved of the absences. The children's division shall
notify the school district that the home visit has occurred within one week after such
home visit.
4. If a child accrues additional unexcused absences after the home visit and
notification described in subsection 3 of this section, such absences shall be deemed a
violation of section 167.031 and the child's parent, legal guardian, or other person
having charge, custody, or control of the child shall be subject to the penalty established
in section 167.061.
✔